Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) All health benefit plans, as defined  in ORS 743B.005, shall include cover-
age of the treatment of perimenopause, menopause and  postmenopause, including but not
limited to the following:
(a) Hormone therapy including combination estrogen and hormone  medicines, combina-
tion estrogen and progesterone medicines and estrogen-only medicines;
(b) SSRIs and SNRIs;
(c) Vaginal estrogen;
(d) Medications to prevent or treat osteoporosis;
(e) Neurokinin B antagonists;
(f) Topical hormone therapy; and
(g) Bioidentical hormones.
(2) The coverage required in this section is limited to  drugs that have been approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
Enrolled House Bill 3064 (HB 3064-B) Page 1
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by sections 9 and 10, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by sections 11 and 12, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
Enrolled House Bill 3064 (HB 3064-B) Page 2
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 7,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by
the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit
plan premiums and self-insurance, is increased  by $1,109,179 for perimenopause, menopause
and postmenopause health insurance benefit coverage.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit
plan premiums and self-insurance, is increased by $291,077 for perimenopause,  menopause
and postmenopause health insurance benefit coverage.
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to health benefit plans and health care
service contracts issued, renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 243.144 and 243.877 by sections 3  to 6 of this 2025 Act apply
to health benefit plans offered by  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Edu-
cators Benefit Board  that are issued, renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2026, and
for self-insured health benefit plans in effect for periods beginning on  or after January 1,
2026.
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3064 (HB 3064-B) Page 3